Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 2

Youth Advisory Council

43-21-201. Establishment.

The commissioner of agriculture is authorized to appoint and convene a youth advisory council to study and recommend to the commissioner methods of promoting the involvement of youth in Tennessee agricultural fairs and shows.

Acts 1981, ch. 288, § 1.

Cross-References. Powers and duties of department of agriculture, § 4-3-203.

Premiums at fairs, § 39-17-508.

Race meeting fairs, § 36-311.

State and county fairs, § 5-9-102.

43-21-202. Membership.

The council may consist of up to nine (9) members, appointed in such manner as to give equal representation to each of the three (3) grand divisions of the state. The commissioner shall appoint at least one (1) member from the membership of each of the following organizations: Future Farmers of America, 4-H, and Future Homemakers of America.

Members must be sixteen (16) through twenty-one (21) years of age, and they must be recommended to serve on the council by the board of any agricultural fair.

Acts 1981, ch. 288, § 1.

Cross-References. Grand divisions of state, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

43-21-203. Meetings — Expenses.

The council may be convened as often as three (3) times annually, and expenses of council members shall be reimbursed in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1981, ch. 288, § 1.

43-21-204. Terms of members.

Members shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner of agriculture.

Acts 1981, ch. 288, § 1.